Washington statutes.
RCW 6.32.200

Party or witness not excused from answering.

A party or witness examined in a special proceeding authorized by this chapter is not excused from answering a question on the ground that his or her examination will tend to convict him or her of a commission of a fraud, or to prove that he or she has been a party to or privy to or knowing of a conveyance, assignment, transfer, or other disposition of property for any purpose; or that he, she, or another person claims to be entitled as against the judgment creditor or receiver appointed or to be appointed in the special proceeding to hold property derived from or through the judgment debtor, or to be discharged from the payment of a debt which was due to the judgment debtor or to a person in his or her behalf. But an answer cannot be used as evidence against the person so answering in a criminal action or criminal proceeding.

[ 2011 c 336 s 162; 1893 c 133 s 20; RRS s 632.]